Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 5. Sidewalks

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability for injury to roller skater allegedly caused by sidewalk or street defects, 58 ALR4th 1197.

§ 15-6-501.
Contracts for construction.

Any first class city or any town having a population of four thousand (4,000) or more may provide by ordinance for letting to the lowest responsible bidder for any period not exceeding one (1) year, as prescribed by the ordinance, a contract for the construction, in accordance with specifications prepared by the city engineer and approved by the governing body, of all cement or concrete sidewalks which the governing body may order constructed during the term of the contract. The proposed ordinance shall be published at least two (2) times in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town, and written notice thereof shall be served in the manner provided by Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure upon the owner or owners of property abutting the sidewalks which have then been ordered and which are then proposed to be ordered to be constructed. The first publication of the ordinance shall be made and written notices served not less than thirty (30) days before the date for hearing objections. Any owner of any lot or parcel of land or property to be assessed for the cost of construction of the sidewalks then ordered or proposed to be ordered to be constructed may appear in person or by counsel at the hearing and show cause, if any, why the sidewalks should not be constructed. If objections are made to the construction of the sidewalks by the owners or agents representing more than one-half (1/2) of the total number of lineal feet frontage of all property which would be assessed to defray the cost of the sidewalks, the sidewalks shall not be constructed. The contractor shall give bond for the performance of his contract as required by the ordinance. The ordinance shall provide that upon ordering the construction of any such sidewalk the city engineer or the street commissioner shall immediately give written notice thereof, served personally on the owner or owners, or agents of the abutting property, or by publication once a week for a period of four (4) weeks in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town, fully describing the termini, course, width and character of the walk ordered. The notice shall provide for a period of thirty (30) days during which parties so desiring may construct the walk abutting their property, and that all the walks so ordered remaining unbuilt at the expiration of the thirty (30) days from the date of service, or of the first publication, shall be constructed by the contractor. The ordinance shall also provide that at the expiration of the thirty (30) days the city engineer or the street commissioner shall notify the contractor to build the portions of the sidewalk ordered that have not been built. The contractor shall construct the sidewalk in accordance with the ordinance and his contract within sixty (60) days after he is so notified.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 394; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-394; Laws 1973, ch. 118, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to construction and maintenance of sidewalks and curbs by cities operating under city manager form of government, see § 15-4-306(a) and (b).

For provision that grade and width of parking shall be established prior to order for new sidewalk or curb, in connection with cities operating under the city manager form of government, see § 15-4-306(c).

For the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure, see

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Competitive Bidding on Public Works in Wyoming: Determination of Responsibility and Preference,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 243 (1976).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Degree of inequality in sidewalk which makes question for jury or for court as to municipality's liability, 37 ALR2d 1187.

Municipal liability for injury or death from collision with rope or clothesline across sidewalk or street, 75 ALR2d 565.

§ 15-6-502.
Assessment; costs included; property affected.

The total cost of all sidewalks constructed by the city contractor under this article, which includes that of the sidewalk proper as well as that of any notice, curbing, grading, handrailing, private crossing and all other necessary expenses, shall be assessed by the governing body by motion, resolution or ordinance as a special assessment against the property in front of which the sidewalk is built. The property occupying street corners shall be assessed for that part of the sidewalk thereon which is within the street intersection.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 395; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-395; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-503.
Assessment; when payable; warrants; collection; interest; treasurer's duties.

All costs and expenses of building any sidewalk under this article shall be defrayed by special assessment payable in installments and extending over a period of four (4) years. The governing body may issue special improvement warrants for the installments and levy assessments to pay them. The assessments shall be collected as other city taxes.

Special improvement warrants shall bear interest at the rate allowed on public warrants pursuant to W.S.

9-4-106

.

The city treasurer shall receive payment in full and give receipts for the entire special assessment of this character on any property with interest to the date of payment when tendered by the owner or agent. Upon receipt of any entire payment the city treasurer shall give notice thereof in writing to the proper tax authorities.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 396, 397; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-396, 15.1-397; W.S. 1977, §§

15-6-503

,

15-6-504

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 37, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 15-6-504.
Other provisions applicable.

Any city or town authorized by this article may proceed in the matter of sidewalk construction either under this article or under the provisions of law already in force in regard to sidewalk construction, or partly under the provisions of this article and partly under the older provisions of law. It is the intention of this article to supplement but not to supersede or otherwise affect other provisions of law with regard to powers of first class cities in relation to sidewalks.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 398; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-398; W.S. 1977, § 15-6-505; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.